Missouri, session 2026, HB2875.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 171, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 171.216, to read as follows:
171.216. 1. Each school district and charter school that currently uses, has
within the past year used, or in the future begins to use a tutoring program or service
with at least a fifty-percent ownership interest held outside the United States shall notify
the parent of each student enrolled in such school district or charter school.
2. Such notice shall contain:
(1) The name of the tutoring program or service;
(2) A disclosure of the owner holding a majority ownership interest in such
tutoring program or service; and
(3) Whether such owner is based in a country designated by the U.S. Department
of State as a Country of Particular Concern (CPC) as of the first day of the school year
in which the notice is posted.
3. Each school district and charter school shall post such notice:
(1) On the school district's or charter school's website; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2875 2
(2) Within any application or software the school district or charter school uses
in conjunction with the tutoring program or service owned by an entity having at least a
fifty-percent ownership interest held outside of the United States.
✔